Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202086-1229
Wireless facility, defined.

(1) Wireless facility means equipment at a fixed location that enables wireless communications between user equipment and a communications network, including (a) equipment associated with wireless communications and (b) radio transceivers, antennas, coaxial or fiber-optic cable, regular power supply, and small back-up battery, regardless of technological configuration. Wireless facility includes small wireless facilities.

(2) Wireless facility does not include (a) the structure or improvements on, under, or within the equipment which is collocated, (b) coaxial or fiber-optic cable that is between wireless structures or utility poles or that is otherwise not immediately adjacent to, or directly associated with, a particular antenna, or (c) a wireline backhaul facility.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 29.